Hawaii, session 2025, GM1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that it is necessary to
authorize the Hawaii medical board to conduct criminal history
record checks to fully comply with the statutes, rules,
policies, and bylaws of the Interstate Medical Licensure
Compact. This authorization will enable Hawaii to participate
as a state of principal license in the compact. Without the
designation as a state of principal license, physicians licensed
in Hawaii who are otherwise eligible and seeking to participate
in the compact would need to apply for compact licensure through
other states serving as their states of principal license.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the
Hawaii medical board to perform criminal history record checks,
thereby allowing the Hawaii medical board to fully comply with
the statute, rules, policies, and bylaws of the Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact as a state of principal license.
SECTION 2. Section 846-2.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO. E
"(b) Criminal history record checks may be conducted by:
(1) The department of health or its designee on operators
of adult foster homes for individuals with
developmental disabilities or developmental
disabilities domiciliary homes and their employees, as
provided by section 321-15.2;
(2) The department of health or its designee on
prospective employees, persons seeking to serve as
providers, or subcontractors in positions that place
them in direct contact with clients when providing
non-witnessed direct mental health or health care
services as provided by section 321-171.5;
(3) The department of health or its designee on all
applicants for licensure or certification for,
operators for, prospective employees, adult
volunteers, and all adults, except adults in care, at
healthcare facilities as defined in section 321-15.2;
(4) The department of education on employees, prospective
employees, and teacher trainees in any public school
in positions that necessitate close proximity to
children as provided by section 302A-601.5;
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
(5) The counties on employees and prospective employees
who may be in positions that place them in close
proximity to children in recreation or child care
programs and services;
(6) The county liquor commissions on applicants for liquor
licenses as provided by section 281-53.5;
(7) The county liquor commissions on employees and
prospective employees involved in liquor
administration, law enforcement, and liquor control
investigations;
(8) The department of human services on operators and
employees of child caring institutions, child placing
organizations, and resource family homes as provided
by section 346-17;
(9) The department of human services on prospective
adoptive parents as established under section
346-19.7 ;
(10) The department of human services or its designee on
applicants to operate child care facilities, household
members of the applicant, prospective employees of the
applicant, and new employees and household members of
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 3

Page 4
S.B. NO. T
h j
the provider after registration or licensure as
provided by section 346-154, and persons subject to
section 346-152.5;
(11) The department of human services on persons exempt
pursuant to section 346-152 to be eligible to provide
child care and receive child care subsidies as
provided by section 346-152.5;
(12) The department of health on operators and employees of
home and community-based case management agencies and
operators and other adults, except for adults in care,
residing in community care foster family homes as
provided by section 321-15.2;
(13) The department of human services on staff members of
the Hawaii youth correctional facility as provided by
section 352-5.5;
(14) The department of human services on employees,
prospective employees, and volunteers of contracted
providers and subcontractors in positions that place
them in close proximity to youth when providing
services on behalf of the office or the Hawaii youth
correctional facility as provided by section 352D-4.3;
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiNBiniBiiiiiiiiiiim

Page 5 S.B. NO. T
h i
(15) The judiciary on employees and applicants at detention
and shelter facilities as provided by section 571-34;
(16) The department of corrections and rehabilitation on
employees and prospective employees, volunteers,
contract service providers, and subcontract service
providers who are directly involved with the treatment
and care of, or directly involved in providing
correctional programs and services to, persons
committed to a correctional facility, or placed in
close proximity to persons committed when providing
services on behalf of the department or the
correctional facility, as provided by section 353-1.5
and the department of law enforcement on employees and
prospective employees whose duties involve or may
involve the exercise of police powers including the
power of arrest as provided by section 353C-5;
(17) The board of private detectives and guards on
applicants for private detective or private guard
licensure as provided by section 463-9;
(18) Private schools and designated organizations on
employees and prospective employees who may be in
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 6 S.B. NO. ""
positions that necessitate close proximity to
children; provided that private schools and designated
organizations receive only indications of the states
from which the national criminal history record
information was provided pursuant to section 302C-1;
(19) The public library system on employees and prospective
employees whose positions place them in close
proximity to children as provided by section 302A-
601.5;
(20) The State or any of its branches, political
subdivisions, or agencies on applicants and employees
holding a position that has the same type of contact
with children, vulnerable adults, or persons committed
to a correctional facility as other public employees
who hold positions that are authorized by law to
require criminal history record checl<s as a condition
of employment as provided by section 78-2.7;
(21) The department of health on licensed adult day care
center operators, employees, new employees,
subcontracted service providers and their employees,
and adult volunteers as provided by section 321-15.2;
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 7 S.B. NO. "'i
(22) The department of human services on purchase of
service contracted and subcontracted service providers
and their employees and volunteers, as provided by
sections 346-2.5 and 346-97;
(23) The department of human services on foster grandparent
program, senior companion program, and respite
companion program participants as provided by section
346-97;
(24) The department of human services on contracted and
subcontracted service providers and their current and
prospective employees that provide home and community­
based services under section 1915(c) of the Social
Security Act, title 42 United States Code section
1396n(c), or under any other applicable section or
sections of the Social Security Act for the purposes
of providing home and community-based services, as
provided by section 346-97;
(25) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on
proposed directors and executive officers of a bank,
savings bank, savings and loan association, trust
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 7

Page 8 S.B. NO.
company, and depository financial services loan
company as provided by section 412:3-201;
(26) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on
proposed directors and executive officers of a
nondepository financial services loan company as
provided by section 412:3-301;
(27) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on the
original chartering applicants and proposed executive
officers of a credit union as provided by section
412:10-103;
(28) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on:
(A) Each principal of every non-corporate applicant
for a money transmitter license;
(B) Each person who upon approval of an application
by a corporate applicant for a money transmitter
license will be a principal of the licensee; and
(C) Each person who upon approval of an application
requesting approval of a proposed change in
control of licensee will be a principal of the
licensee,
as provided by sections 489D-9 and 489D-15;
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx
iHiniiaiiiMiiHiHHinnH

Page 9 S.B. NO. ""
(29) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on
applicants for licensure and persons licensed under
title 24;
(30) The Hawaii health systems corporation on:
(A) Employees;
(B) Applicants seelcing employment;
(C) Current or prospective members of the corporation
board or regional system board; or
(D) Current or prospective volunteers, providers, or
contractors,
in any of the corporation's health facilities as
provided by section 323F-5.5;
(31) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on:
(A) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator
license, or license renewal; and
(B) Each control person, executive officer, director,
general partner, and managing member of an
applicant for a mortgage loan originator company
license or license renewal,
as provided by chapter 454F;
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 9

Page 10 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(32) The state public charter school commission or public
charter schools on employees, teacher trainees,
prospective employees, and prospective teacher
trainees in any public charter school for any position
that places them in close proximity to children, as
provided in section 302D-33;
(33) The counties on prospective employees who work with
children, vulnerable adults, or senior citizens in
community-based programs;
(34) The counties on prospective employees for fire
department positions that involve contact with
children or vulnerable adults;
(35) The counties on prospective employees for emergency
medical services positions that involve contact with
children or vulnerable adults;
(36) The counties on prospective employees for emergency
management positions and community volunteers whose
responsibilities involve planning and executing
homeland security measures including viewing,
handling, and engaging in law enforcement or
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 10

Page 11 S.B. NO.
classified meetings and assisting vulnerable citizens
during emergencies or crises;
(37) The State and counties on employees, prospective
employees, volunteers, and contractors whose position
responsibilities require unescorted access to secured
areas and equipment related to a traffic management
center;
(38) The State and counties on employees and prospective
employees whose positions involve the handling or use
of firearms for other than law enforcement purposes;
(39) The State and counties on current and prospective
systems analysts and others involved in an agency's
information technology operation whose position
responsibilities provide them with access to
proprietary, confidential, or sensitive information;
(40) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on:
(A) Applicants for real estate appraiser licensure or
certification as provided by chapter 466K;
(B) Each person who owns more than ten per cent of an
appraisal management company who is applying for
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 11

Page 12 S.B. NO.
registration as an appraisal management company,
as provided by section 466M-7; and
(C) Each of the controlling persons of an applicant
for registration as an appraisal management
company, as provided by section 466M-7;
(41) The department of health or its designee on:
(A) Individual applicants or individuals acting on
behalf of applying entities for hemp processor
permits as provided under section 328G-2; and
(B) All license applicants, licensees, employees,
contractors, and prospective employees of medical
cannabis dispensaries, and individuals permitted
to enter and remain in medical cannabis
dispensary facilities as provided under sections
329D-15(a) (4) and 329D-16 (a) (3) ;
(42) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on
applicants for nurse licensure or license renewal,
reactivation, or restoration as provided by sections
457-7, 457-8, 457-8.5, and 457-9;
(43) The county police departments on applicants for
permits to acquire firearms pursuant to section 134-2,
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 12

Page 13 S.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
on individuals registering their firearms pursuant to
section 134-3, and on applicants for new or renewed
licenses to carry a pistol or revolver and ammunition
pursuant to section 134-9;
(44) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on:
(A) Each of the controlling persons of the applicant
for licensure as an escrow depository, and each
of the officers, directors, and principals who
will be in charge of the escrow depository's
activities upon licensure; and
II (B) Each of the controlling persons of an applicant
for proposed change in control of an escrow
depository licensee, and each of the officers,
directors, and principals who will be in charge
of the licensee's activities upon approval of the
application,
as provided by chapter 449;
(45) The department of taxation on current or prospective
employees or contractors who have access to federal
tax information in order to comply with requirements
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 13

Page 14 S.B. NO.
of federal law, regulation, or procedure, as provided
by section 231-1.6;
(46) The department of labor and industrial relations on
current or prospective employees or contractors who
have access to federal tax information in order to
comply with requirements of federal law, regulation.
or procedure, as provided by section 383-110;
(47) The department of human services on current or
prospective employees or contractors who have access
to federal tax information in order to comply with
requirements of federal law, regulation, or procedure,
and on current or prospective employees, volunteers.
contractors, or contractors' employees or volunteers.
subcontractors, or subcontractors' employees or
volunteers, whose position places or would place them
in close proximity to minors, young adults, or
vulnerable adults, as provided by section 346-2.5;
(48) The child support enforcement agency on current or
prospective employees or contractors who have access
to federal tax information in order to comply with
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 14

Page 15 S.B. NO.
federal law, regulation, or procedure, as provided by
section 576D-11.5;
(49) The department of the attorney general on current or
prospective employees or employees or agents of
contractors who have access to federal tax information
to comply with requirements of federal law,
regulation, or procedure, as provided by section 28-
17;
(50) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on
each control person, executive officer, director,
general partner, and managing member of an installment
loan licensee, or an applicant for an installment loan
license, as provided in chapter 480J;
(51) The university of Hawaii on current and prospective
employees and contractors whose duties include
ensuring the security of campus facilities and
persons; [aad]
(52) The department of commerce and consumer affairs on
applicants for physician licensure or license renewal,
through the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact as
provided by section 453B-2; and
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 15
■■■■■■■MH

Page 16 S.B. NO.
[ (52)] (53) Any other organization, entity, or the State,
its branches, political subdivisions, or agencies as
may be authorized by state law."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025;
provided that the amendments made to section 846-2.7, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, by section 2 of this Act shall not be repealed
when section 846-2.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is reenacted on
July 1, 2027, pursuant to section 4 of Act 110, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2024.
2025-2811 SB1365 CDl SMA-l.docx 16

S.B. NO 1365
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B. No. 1365, H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai'i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
103

SB No. 1365, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives